Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 5. SANITATION AND ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY

SUBTITLE B. SOLID WASTE, TOXIC CHEMICALS, SEWAGE, LITTER, AND WATER

CHAPTER 367. ON-SITE WASTEWATER TREATMENT RESEARCH

Sec. 367.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality.

(2) "On-site wastewater treatment system" means a system of treatment devices or disposal facilities that:

(A) is used for the disposal of domestic sewage, excluding liquid waste resulting from the processes used in industrial and commercial establishments;

(B) is located on the site where the sewage is produced; and

(C) produces not more than 5,000 gallons of waste a day.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 1.039, eff. Aug. 12, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 11.116, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 347, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1021 (H.B. 2694), Sec. 8.02, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 367.007. ADMINISTRATION. (a) The commission may accept grants and donations from other sources to supplement the fees collected under Section 367.010. Grants and donations shall be deposited to the credit of the water resource management account and may be disbursed as the commission directs and in accordance with Section 367.008.

(b) Administrative and facilities support costs are payable from the water resources management account.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 1.041, eff. Dec. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 11.118, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 347, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1021 (H.B. 2694), Sec. 8.03, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 367.008. AWARD OF COMPETITIVE GRANTS. (a) The commission shall establish procedures for awarding competitive grants and disbursing grant money.

(b) The commission shall award competitive grants to support applied research and demonstration projects by accredited colleges and universities in this state, by other governmental entities, or by acceptable public or private research centers regarding on-site wastewater treatment technology and systems applicable to this state that are directed toward improving the quality of wastewater treatment and reducing the cost of providing wastewater treatment to consumers, including wastewater reuse.

(c) The commission shall seek the advice of relevant experts when choosing research topics and awarding grants under this chapter.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 3, Sec. 1.042, eff. Dec. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1021 (H.B. 2694), Sec. 8.04, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 867 (H.B. 2771), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 367.009. APPROPRIATIONS. Money collected and appropriated for the purposes of this chapter shall be disbursed as the commission directs and in accordance with Section 367.008.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1021 (H.B. 2694), Sec. 8.05, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 367.010. FEES. (a) The commission and each county, municipality, public health department, and river authority shall collect a $10 fee for each on-site wastewater treatment permit application processed.

(b) A county, municipality, public health department, or river authority that collects a fee shall forward the fee to the commission.

(c) The commission shall enforce the collection and forwarding of the fee.

(d) The fee proceeds shall be deposited to the credit of the water resources management account and may be used only for the purposes of Sections 367.007 and 367.008.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 11.119, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 347, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 27 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1021 (H.B. 2694), Sec. 8.06, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 867 (H.B. 2771), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.